Idaho, session 2025, H0392.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 58, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 2. That Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 58, Title 33, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 58
DISTRICTS OF INNOVATION
33-5801. DISTRICTS OF INNOVATION. (1) The state board of education may
designate eligible Idaho school districts as districts of innovation for the
purposes of improving students' educational performance.
(2) To meet the diverse needs of students, districts of innovation
shall be provided exemption from certain provisions of state law, adminis-
trative rules, and state board of education policies.
(3) The state board of education shall promulgate any administrative
rules, subject to legislative approval, necessary to implement the provi-
sions of this chapter.
(4) This chapter is not intended to limit or restrict innovative mea-
sures implemented by public charter schools.
33-5802. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "District of innovation" means a designated school district with a
local innovation plan that has been approved by the state board of education.
(2) "Innovative education" means a new or creative alternative to ex-
isting instructional and administrative practices intended to improve stu-
dent learning and student performance.
(3) "Local innovation plan" means a plan developed by a school district
that provides a comprehensive program for innovative education. The plan
shall identify administrative requirements that inhibit the goals of the
plan and from which the school district should be exempt, subject to section
33-5805(2), Idaho Code. The plan may include:


(a) Innovative curriculum, instructional methods, and provisions re-
garding community participation, campus governance, and parental in-
volvement;
(b) Modifications to the school day or year;
(c) Provisions regarding the district budget and sustainable program
funding;
(d) Accountability and assessment measures that exceed the require-
ments of state and federal law; and
(e) Any other innovations prescribed by the school district board of
trustees.
33-5803. ELIGIBILITY. A school district shall be eligible for desig-
nation as a district of innovation if:
(1) The school district approves a local innovation plan that:
(a) Identifies changes needed in the district that may lead to better
prepared students for success in life and work;
(b) Provides documentation of support from the community, educators,
parents, and the school board for the proposed innovations;
(c) Identifies administrative requirements imposed by Idaho law, ad-
ministrative rules, and state board of education policies from which
the school district requests to be exempt;
(d) Provides detailed information regarding the rationale of requests
for exemptions; and
(e) Documents the fiscal and human resources the school board will pro-
vide throughout the term of the implementation of the innovations; and
(2) The school district's local innovative plan establishes goals and
performance targets. Such goals and performance targets may include:
(a) Reducing achievement gaps among public school students by expand-
ing learning experiences for students who are identified as academi-
cally low achieving;
(b) Increasing pupil learning through the implementation of high, rig-
orous standards for pupil performance;
(c) Increasing the participation of students in various curriculum and
instructional components within selected schools to enhance perfor-
mance at each grade level;
(d) Increasing the number of students who are college or career ready;
(e) Motivating students at different grade levels by offering more cur-
riculum choices and student learning opportunities to parents and stu-
dents within the district; and
(f) Providing additional pathways for advanced students.
33-5804. AUTHORIZATION. (1) After a school district board of trustees
has approved a local innovation plan, it shall submit such plan to the state
board of education for approval or denial of its designation as a district of
innovation.
(2) If a school district is designated as a district of innovation, it
shall begin operation in accordance with the local innovation plan.
(3) The term of a school district's designation as a district of inno-
vation shall be continuously contingent on a biennial review of the school


district's local innovation plan by the state board of education pursuant to
section 33-5806(3), Idaho Code.
(4) A school district designated as a district of innovation shall en-
sure that a copy of the district's current local innovation plan is available
to the public by posting and maintaining the plan in a prominent location on
the district's website.
(5) Two (2) school districts may submit one (1) local innovation plan
if the requirements of section 33-5803, Idaho Code, are met and both school
districts' boards of trustees have approved the plan.
33-5805. EXEMPTIONS. (1) A district of innovation shall be exempt from
any subsequent amendment or redesignation of an identified state require-
ment, unless the subsequent amendment or redesignation specifically applies
to a district of innovation.
(2) A local innovation plan shall not provide an exemption from:
(a) Any federally mandated requirements;
(b) Requirements related to open enrollment;
(c) Requirements pursuant to chapter 10, title 33, Idaho Code; and
(d) State curriculum and graduation requirements.
33-5806. AMENDMENT OR TERMINATION OF LOCAL INNOVATION PLAN. (1) A lo-
cal innovation plan may be amended if the action is approved by a vote of the
school district board of trustees and the state board of education.
(2) A local innovation plan may be terminated if the action is approved
by a vote of the school district board of trustees. In the event a plan is
terminated by the school district, the state board of education must be noti-
fied within thirty (30) days of such termination.
(3) The state board of education shall establish criteria to determine
whether a school district is successfully meeting the goals outlined in its
local innovation plan and review each plan every two (2) years. If after re-
viewing a school district's plan, the state board of education determines
that the school district is not successfully meeting its goals, the state
board may terminate the school district's designation as a district of inno-
vation.
(4) Instead of terminating a school district's designation pursuant to
subsection (3) of this section, the state board of education may permit the
school district to amend its local innovation plan to address concerns spec-
ified by the state board of education.
(5) The state board of education shall compile information from its re-
views of local innovation plans to determine what innovations are success-
fully improving students' educational performance. Such data shall be made
publicly available for the benefit of all school districts.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.